Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-7,105
Pending action or proceeding under Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act; law applicable.

Any action or proceeding under the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act pending on January 1, 1994, shall continue under the provisions of such act until the court rules on any pending action or proceeding.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 57.